Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2604.01
Arbitrators; disqualification.

Any person proposed for nomination by all parties or all party arbitrators to serve as a neutral arbitrator shall disqualify himself or herself, upon demand of any party to the arbitration agreement made before the commencement of the proceedings, on any of the grounds specified in section 24-739 for disqualification of a judge or on the ground that such person is an employee or independent contractor of an industry, trade, or professional association of which only one party is a member if the grounds were known or should have been known by the movant.

Laws 1997, LB 151, § 5.